Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-907
Board of adjustment; appointment; restriction on powers.

Except as provided in section 19-912.01, the city council or village board of trustees of a municipality which has adopted zoning regulations pursuant to sections 19-901 to 19-915 shall provide for the appointment of a board of adjustment. Any actions taken by the board of adjustment shall not exceed the powers granted by section 19-910.

Laws 1927, c. 43, § 7, p. 184;

C.S.1929, § 19-907;

R.S.1943, § 19-907;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 16;

Laws 1978, LB 186, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 901, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 73.